Utah statutes.
76-7-101.5.   Child bigamy -- Penalty.

(1)  An actor 18 years of age or older is guilty of child bigamy when, knowing he or she has a wife or husband, or knowing that a person under 18 years of age has a wife or husband, the actor carries out the following with the person who is under 18 years of age:

(a)  purports to marry the person who is under 18 years of age; or

(b)  cohabits with the person who is under 18 years of age.

(2)  A violation of Subsection (1) is a second degree felony.



Enacted by Chapter 6, 2003 General Session

